Utah statutes.
70A-9a-301.   Law governing perfection and priority of security interests.
Except as otherwise provided in Sections 70A-9a-303 through 70A-9a-306, the
following rules determine the law governing perfection, the effect of
perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in
collateral:
(1)  Except as otherwise provided in this section, while a debtor is located
in a jurisdiction, the local law of that jurisdiction governs perfection, the
effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest
in collateral.
(2)  While collateral is located in a jurisdiction, the local law of that
jurisdiction governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection,
and the priority of a possessory security interest in that collateral.
(3)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (4), while tangible negotiable
documents, goods, instruments, money, or tangible chattel paper is located in
a jurisdiction, the local law of that jurisdiction governs:
(a)  perfection of a security interest in the goods by filing a fixture
filing;
(b)  perfection of a security interest in timber to be cut; and
(c)  the effect of perfection or nonperfection and the priority of a
nonpossessory security interest in the collateral.
(4)  The local law of the jurisdiction in which the wellhead or minehead is
located governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the
priority of a security interest in as-extracted collateral.
